Vermont, session 2025-2026, H954.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
15 Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
16 The General Assembly approves the amendment to the charter of the Town
17 of Stowe as set forth in this act. The voters of the Town approved the
18 proposals of amendment on March 3, 2026.
19 Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 153 is amended to read:
20 CHAPTER 153. TOWN OF STOWE

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.954
2026 Page 2 of 3
1 * * *
2 § 904. LOCALOPTION TAX
3 (a) The Selectboard is authorized to impose a two percent local option tax
4 on sales, rooms, meals, and alcoholic beverages. A taximposed pursuant to
5 this section shall be collected and administered by the Department of Taxes
6 pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138.
7 (b) The local option taxauthorized by this section supersedes any local
8 option taxpreviously adopted and approved by the Town.
9 * * *
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 153 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 153. TOWN OF STOWE
Subchapter 9. Taxes
* * *
§ 904. LOCAL OPTION TAX
(a) The Selectboard is authorized to impose a two percent local option tax
on sales, rooms, meals, and alcoholic beverages. A tax imposed pursuant to
this section shall be collected and administered by the Department of Taxes
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138.
(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of 24 V.S.A. §138 or 32 V.S.A.
§ 3709, of any local option tax collected in excess of one percent, 50 percent
shall be paid to the Local Option Municipal Transportation Special Fund

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.954
2026 Page 3 of 3
established pursuant to 19 V.S.A. § 306b and 50 percent shall be paid to the
Town.
(c) The local option tax authorized by this section supersedes any local
option tax previously adopted and approved by the Town.
* * *
1 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
2 This act shall take effect on passage.